Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska81-5,157
Fire Service and Safety Training Program; transfer to State Fire Marshal; personnel, records, and other property; transfer.

The Fire Service and Safety Training Program is hereby transferred to the State Fire Marshal. All personnel of the program in the State Department of Education who manage, teach, are office personnel, or are involved in the running of the program shall be transferred to the office of the State Fire Marshal on July 1, 1993.

All furniture, equipment, books, files, records, leases, and other property used by the Nebraska Fire Service shall be transferred and delivered to the State Fire Marshal on July 1, 1993.

Laws 1993, LB 348, § 92.